District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.15

Quorum.

(a)

Unless the articles of organization provide for a greater number, a majority of the total number of directors specified by the organic rules shall constitute a quorum for a meeting of the directors.

(b)

If a quorum of the board of directors is present at the beginning of a meeting, any action taken by the directors present shall be valid even if withdrawal of directors originally present results in the number of directors being fewer than the number required for a quorum.

(c)

A director present at a meeting but objecting to notice under § 29-1008.14(b)(1) or (2) shall not count toward a quorum.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 815 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition